Alaska statutes. Title 39. Public Officers and Employees.
Article 2. Protection for Whistleblowers.

Sec. 39.90.100.
Persons protected.

A public employer may not discharge, threaten, or otherwise discriminate against an employee regarding the employee’s compensation, terms, conditions, location, or privileges of employment because

the employee, or a person acting on behalf of the employee, reports to a public body or is about to report to a public body a matter of public concern; or

the employee participates in a court action, an investigation, a hearing, or an inquiry held by a public body on a matter of public concern.

A public employer may not disqualify a public employee or other person who reports a matter of public concern or participates in a proceeding connected with a matter of public concern before a public body or court, because of the report or participation, from eligibility to

bid on contracts with the public employer;

receive land under a law of the state or an ordinance of the municipality; or

receive another right, privilege, or benefit.

The provisions of AS

39.90.100

—

39.90.150

do not

require an employer to compensate an employee for participation in a court action or in an investigation, hearing, or inquiry by a public body;

prohibit an employer from compensating an employee for participation in a court action or in an investigation, hearing, or inquiry by a public body;

authorize the disclosure of information that is legally required to be kept confidential; or

diminish or impair the rights of an employee under a collective bargaining agreement.

An employer shall post notices and use other appropriate means to inform employees of their protections and obligations under AS

39.90.100

—

39.90.150

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 27 SLA 1989)

Sec. 39.90.110.
Limitation to protections.

A person is not entitled to the protections under AS

39.90.100

—

39.90.150

unless the person

reasonably believes that the information reported is or is about to become a matter of public concern; and

reports the information in good faith.

A person is entitled to the protections under AS

39.90.100

—

39.90.150

only if the matter of public concern

is not the result of conduct by the person seeking protection; or

is the result of conduct by the person that was required by the person’s employer.

As part of its written personnel policy, a public employer may require that, before an employee initiates a report on a matter of public concern under AS

39.90.100

, the employee shall submit a written report concerning the matter to the employer. However, the employee is not required to submit a report if the employee

reasonably believes that reports to the employer will not result in prompt action to remedy the matter of public concern;

believes with reasonable certainty that the activity, policy, or practice is already known to one or more supervisors;

reasonably believes that an emergency is involved; or

reasonably fears reprisal or discrimination as a result of disclosure.

History.

(§ 1 ch 27 SLA 1989)

Sec. 39.90.120.
Relief and penalties.

A person who alleges a violation of AS

39.90.100

may bring a civil action and the court may grant appropriate relief, including punitive damages.

A person who violates or attempts to violate AS

39.90.100

is also liable for a civil fine of not more than $10,000. The attorney general may enforce this subsection.

A person who attempts to prevent another person from making a report or participating in a matter under AS

39.90.100(a)

with intent to impede or prevent a public inquiry on the matter is liable for a civil fine of not more than $10,000.

History.

(§ 1 ch 27 SLA 1989)

Sec. 39.90.130.
Exemption for municipalities.

A municipality is not required to comply with the provisions of AS

39.90.100

—

39.90.150

if the municipality has adopted an ordinance that provides protections for its employees and other persons that are substantially similar to the protections under AS

39.90.100

—

39.90.150

. Notwithstanding AS

29.25.070

, the ordinance may provide for a civil penalty for violation of the ordinance not to exceed $10,000.

History.

(§ 1 ch 27 SLA 1989)

Sec. 39.90.140.
Definitions.

In AS

39.90.100

—

39.90.150

,

“employee” or “public employee” means a person who performs a service for wages or other remuneration under a contract of hire, written or oral, express or implied, for a public employer;

“employer” or “public employer” includes the state, a public or quasi-public corporation or authority established by state law, the University of Alaska, and a political subdivision of the state including a municipality, school district, and regional educational attendance area;

“matter of public concern” means

a violation of a state, federal, or municipal law, regulation, or ordinance;

a danger to public health or safety;

gross mismanagement, a substantial waste of funds, or a clear abuse of authority;

a matter accepted for investigation by the office of the ombudsman under AS

24.55.100

or

24.55.320

; or

interference or any failure to cooperate with an audit or other matter within the authority of Legislative Budget and Audit Committee;

“public body” includes an officer or agency of

the federal government;

the state;

a political subdivision of the state including

a municipality;

a school district; and

a regional educational attendance area;

a public or quasi-public corporation or authority established by state law including the Alaska Railroad Corporation; and

the University of Alaska.

History.

(§ 1 ch 27 SLA 1989; am § 6 ch 67 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2005, in (2) and (4), “regional educational” was substituted for “rural educational” to correct a manifest error in ch. 27, SLA 1989.

Sec. 39.90.150.
Short title.

AS

39.90.100

—

39.90.150

may be cited as the Alaska Whistleblower Act.

History.

(§ 1 ch 27 SLA 1989)